hu: Élelmiszerek, italok és dohányáru > Élelmiszertételek > Étel-ajándékkosarak: Alkoholos ajándékkosarak; Dohány-ajándékkosarak
tr: Yiyecek, İçecekler ve Tütün Mamülleri > Yiyecek Çeşitleri > Yiyecek Dolu Hediye Sepetleri: Alkollü hediye sepetleri; Tütün hediye sepetleri
zh-TW: 食物、飲料和菸草 > 食品 > 食品禮籃/禮盒: 酒類禮籃; 菸品禮籃
nl: Eten, drinken en tabak > Voedselitems > Cadeaumanden met voedsel: Cadeaumanden met alcohol; Cadeaumanden met tabak
da: Fødevarer, drikkevarer og tobak > Fødevarer > Gavekurve med mad: Gavekurve med alkohol; Gavekurve med tobak
it: Cibo, bevande e tabacco > Alimenti > Cesti regalo: Cesti regalo con alcolici; Cesti regalo con tabacco
fr: Alimentation, boissons et tabac > Aliments > Paniers cadeaux gourmands: Paniers-cadeaux d'alcool; Paniers-cadeaux de tabac
hr-HR: Hrana, piće i duhan > Prehrambeni artikli > Poklon košare s hranom: Poklon košare s alkoholnim pićima; Poklon košare s duhanskim proizvodima
lt-LT: Maistas, gėrimai ir tabakas > Maisto prekės > Maisto dovanų krepšeliai: Alkoholio dovanų rinkiniai; Tabako dovanų rinkiniai
ru: Продукты, напитки и табачные изделия > Пищевые продукты > Подарочные продуктовые корзины: Подарочные корзины с алкоголем; Подарочные корзины с табачными изделиями
nb: Mat, drikkevarer og tobakk > Matvarer > Gavekurver med mat: Gavekurver med alkohol; Gavekurver med tobakk
el: Τρόφιμα, ποτά & προϊόντα καπνού > Είδη διατροφής > Καλάθια δώρων με τρόφιμα: Καλάθια δώρου με αλκοόλ; Καλάθια δώρου με καπνό
sk-SK: Potraviny, nápoje a tabakové výrobky > Potraviny > Potravinové darčekové koše: Darčekové koše s alkoholom; Darčekové koše s tabakom
sl-SI: Hrana, pijača in tobak > Prehrambeni izdelki > Darilne košare s hrano: Darilne košare z alkoholom; Darilne košare s tobačnimi izdelki
fi: Ruoka, juoma ja tupakkatuotteet > Ruokatuotteet > Ruokakorit: Alkoholilahjakorit; Tupakkalahjakorit
ko: 식품/음료/담배 > 식품 > 식품 선물 바구니: 주류 선물 바구니; 담배 선물 바구니
zh-CN: 饮食/烟酒 > 食品 > 食品礼篮: 酒类礼篮; 烟草礼篮
de: Nahrungsmittel, Getränke & Tabak > Lebensmittel > Delikatessen Präsentkörbe: Alkohol-Präsentkörbe; Tabak-Präsentkörbe
sv: Mat, dryck och tobak > Livsmedel > Matkorgar: Presentkorgar med alkohol; Presentkorgar med tobak
ro-RO: Alimente, băuturi și tutun > Produse alimentare > Coșuri-cadou cu produse alimentare: Coșuri cu produse alcoolice; Coșuri cu produse din tutun
en: Food, Beverages & Tobacco > Food Items > Food Gift Baskets: Alcohol Gift Baskets; Tobacco Gift Baskets
pt-PT: Comida, bebidas e tabaco > Artigos alimentares > Cabazes alimentares: Cabazes de oferta com bebidas alcoólicas; Cabazes de oferta com tabaco
pt-BR: Alimentos, bebidas e tabaco > Alimentos > Cestas de alimentos para presente: Cestas de presente com bebidas alcoólicas; Cestas de presente com tabaco
cs: Jídlo, pití a tabák > Potraviny > Dárkové potravinové koše: Dárkové koše s alkoholem; Dárkové koše s tabákem
pl: Żywność, napoje i tytoń > Żywność > Kosze prezentowe: Kosze prezentowe z alkoholem; Kosze prezentowe z wyrobami tytoniowymi
ja: 食品・飲料 > 食品 > 食品ギフトセット: 酒類ギフトバスケット; タバコギフトバスケット
es: Alimentación, bebida y tabaco > Alimentos > Cestas de comida de regalo: Canastas de regalo con alcohol; Canastas de regalo con tabaco
vi: Thực phẩm, đồ uống và thuốc lá > Hàng thực phẩm > Giỏ quà tặng: Giỏ quà đồ uống có cồn; Giỏ quà thuốc lá
th: อาหาร เครื่องดื่ม และยาสูบ > รายการอาหาร > กระเช้าอาหารของขวัญ: กระเช้าของขวัญเครื่องดื่มแอลกอฮอล์; กระเช้าของขวัญยาสูบ
bg-BG: Храна, напитки и тютюневи изделия > Хранителни продукти > Подаръчни кошници с храна: Подаръчни кошници с алкохол; Подаръчни кошници с тютюневи продукти